Georgia, session 2025_26, HB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "De-escalation Right To Know Law."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to identification and regulation of motor vehicles, is amended by
adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 368
- 1 -

LC 39 4501
"40-1-10.
Upon request from the operator of a vehicle stopped by a law enforcement officer for a
traffic related offense, a law enforcement officer shall provide such operator with the
purpose of the stop and suspected traffic law violation, provided that such operator first
displays his or her driver's license pursuant to Code Section 40-5-29. Failure by a law
enforcement officer to comply with this Code section shall not invalidate an otherwise
lawful arrest or prevent the issuance of a uniform traffic citation."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 368
- 2 -